Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 17. General Offenses and Jurisdiction

§ 1701.
Possession of motor vehicles with serial or motor numbers defaced.

A person shall not knowingly keep in his or her possession or ownership for more than 10 days a motor vehicle or vessel, the manufacturer’s serial or motor numbers or identifying numbers assigned by the Commissioner of which have been changed, tampered with, obliterated, or defaced, unless the person has applied to the Commissioner for the assignment of a new number to be placed on the vehicle or vessel or motor and the application has been granted.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1702.
Assignment of new number.

The application shall not be granted by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles until he or she is satisfied that the person applying for the assignment of such new identifying number is the rightful owner of the motor vehicle described in the application.

§ 1703.
Defacing identifying numbers.

A person who willfully changes or attempts to change, or who tampers with, obliterates, defaces, or in any manner interferes with the original or assigned motor number or manufacturer’s serial number of any motor vehicle or vessel, or with any of the secret or identifying numbers placed by the manufacturer of a motor vehicle or vessel by the Commissioner or any of the parts thereof upon the vehicle or vessel or parts, shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both, for the first offense and fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than five years, or both, for each subsequent offense.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 1704.
Possession prima facie evidence of violation.

The possession by a person of a motor vehicle or vessel, the motor or manufacturer’s serial or Commissioner assigned identifying number of which has been changed, tampered with, obliterated, or defaced, shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of the provisions of section 1703 of this title, unless the person applies to the Commissioner for the assignment of a new number as provided in section 1702 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1704a.
Alteration of odometers.

Any person who sells, attempts to sell, or causes to be sold any motor vehicle, highway building appliance, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle, or snowmobile and has actual knowledge that the odometer, hubometer reading, or clock meter reading has been changed, tampered with, or defaced without disclosing same and a person who changes, tampers with, or defaces, or who attempts to change, tamper with, or deface, any gauge, dial, or other mechanical instrument, commonly known as an odometer, hubometer, or clock meter, in a motor vehicle, highway building appliance, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle, or snowmobile, which, under normal circumstances and without being changed, tampered with, or defaced, is designed to show by numbers or words the distance which the motor vehicle, highway building appliance, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle, or snowmobile travels, or who willfully misrepresents the odometer, hubometer, or clock meter reading on the odometer disclosure statement or similar statement, title, or bill of sale shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 for a first offense and fined not more than $2,500.00 for each subsequent offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1985;

1997, No. 59

, § 77, eff. June 30, 1997;

2001, No. 69

, § 3.

§ 1705.
Impersonating an inspector or examiner.

A person who falsely impersonates or attempts to impersonate a motor vehicle inspector, examiner, or State Police shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $100.00, or both.

§ 1706.
Repealed.
1971, No. 258 (Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1707.
Repealed.
1997, No. 121 (Adj. Sess.), § 39(1).

§ 1708.
Repealed.
1971, No. 228 (Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 1709.
Report of convictions to Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.

The Judicial Bureau and every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under any law of this State or municipal ordinance regulating the operation of motor vehicles on the highways shall forward a record of any conviction to the Commissioner within 10 days for violation of any State or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 85

, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1965, No. 194

, § 10;

1967, No. 138

;

1969, No. 290

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1973, No. 25

, § 2, eff. March 15, 1973;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 19, 1974;

2005, No. 37

, § 9.

§ 1710.
Nolo contendere pleas.

A plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court shall constitute a conviction for the purposes of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 73

.

§ 1711.
Felony or misdemeanor.

A person who, whether present or absent, aids, abets, induces, procures, or causes the commission of an act that, if done directly by him or her, would be a felony or a misdemeanor under a provision of this title, is guilty of the same felony or misdemeanor.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.